dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY -ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZčČžŽěĚšŠabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzЈјЦцУуКкЕеНнГгШшЗзХхФфЫыВвАаПпРрОоЛлДдЖжЄєЧчСсМмИиТтЬьБбЊњЉљđĐśŚęĘŕŔřŔťŤųŲåÅďĎľĽźŹćĆńŃȯȮėĖòÒèÈ

BREAK 1
BREAK =

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS -

FLAG long

COMPOUNDBEGIN xB
COMPOUNDEND xE
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG xP
ONLYINCOMPOUND xO

ICONV 4
ICONV њ нј
ICONV љ лј
ICONV нь нј
ICONV ль лј

MAP 24
MAP ćčc
MAP ęeěėèé
MAP ųu
MAP åa
MAP oȯòó
MAP đ(dž)
MAP ľlłĺ
MAP nňń
MAP rŕř
MAP tť
MAP dď
MAP sś
MAP źz
MAP иі
MAP ђ(дж)
MAP ћ(ч)
MAP јй
MAP я(ја)
MAP ю(ју)
MAP ї(ји)
MAP эе
MAP ј'ъ
MAP ъа
MAP ъо

REP 78
REP e ě
REP e y
REP i y
REP y i
REP e je
REP y e
REP l lj
REP s ss
REP ě e
REP ljenje jenje
REP tuty tutoj
REP j ju
REP og ogo
REP v u
REP ě je
REP je ě
REP y j
REP jedny jedin
REP oro ra
REP olo la
REP sistemom sistemoju
REP gleda gledě
REP gleda gledi
REP krov krv
REP česky čsky
REP gde kde
REP nemečesk němečsk
REP daby da_by
REP lej ljev
REP sa _se
REP sja _se
REP nedolgo ne_dolgo
REP ii iji
REP sofii zofiji
REP svjat svet
REP ogo ojego
REP stč šč
REP št šč
REP aja ajuči
REP е є
REP е ы
REP и ы
REP ы и
REP е је
REP ы е
REP л лј
REP с сс
REP є е
REP лјенје јенје
REP туты тутој
REP ј ју
REP ог ого
REP в у
REP є је
REP је є
REP ы ј
REP једны једин
REP оро ра
REP оло ла
REP системом системоју
REP гледа гледє
REP гледа гледи
REP кров крв
REP ческы чскы
REP где кде
REP немеческ нємечск
REP дабы да_бы
REP леј љев
REP са _се
REP сја _се
REP недолго не_долго
REP ии ији
REP софии зофији
REP свјат свет
REP ого ојего
REP стч шч
REP шт шч
REP аја ајучи

PFX zz Y 1
PFX zz 0 naj .

PFX zx Y 1
PFX zx 0 нај .

SFX AA Y 18
SFX AA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AA o o/xPxBxO .
SFX AA ko či/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česa/xPxE .
SFX AA o a/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čese/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čij/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čes/xPxE .
SFX AA o u/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česi/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čah/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česah/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čam/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česam/xPxE .
SFX AA 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česem/xPxE .
SFX AA ko čami/xPxE .
SFX AA ko česami/xPxE .

SFX AB Y 80
SFX AB ti l .
SFX AB ti la .
SFX AB ti lo .
SFX AB ti li .
SFX AB sati šu .
SFX AB sati šem .
SFX AB sati šeš .
SFX AB sati še .
SFX AB sati šemo .
SFX AB sati šete .
SFX AB sati šut .
SFX AB ti h .
SFX AB ti še .
SFX AB ti hmo .
SFX AB ti ste .
SFX AB ti hu .
SFX AB sati ši .
SFX AB sati šimo .
SFX AB sati šite .
SFX AB sati šuči .
SFX AB sati šučego .
SFX AB sati šučemu .
SFX AB sati šučim .
SFX AB sati šučem .
SFX AB sati šučih .
SFX AB sati šučimi .
SFX AB sati šuča .
SFX AB sati šuču .
SFX AB sati šučej .
SFX AB sati šučeju .
SFX AB sati šuče .
SFX AB sati šemy .
SFX AB sati šemogo .
SFX AB sati šemomu .
SFX AB sati šemym .
SFX AB sati šemom .
SFX AB sati šemo .
SFX AB sati šema .
SFX AB sati šemu .
SFX AB sati šemoj .
SFX AB sati šemoju .
SFX AB sati šemi .
SFX AB sati šeme .
SFX AB sati šemyh .
SFX AB sati šemym .
SFX AB sati šemymi .
SFX AB ti vši .
SFX AB ti všego .
SFX AB ti všemu .
SFX AB ti všim .
SFX AB ti všem .
SFX AB ti vših .
SFX AB ti všimi .
SFX AB ti vša .
SFX AB ti všu .
SFX AB ti všej .
SFX AB ti všeju .
SFX AB ti vše .
SFX AB ti ny .
SFX AB ti nogo .
SFX AB ti nomu .
SFX AB ti nym .
SFX AB ti nom .
SFX AB ti ni .
SFX AB ti ne .
SFX AB ti nyh .
SFX AB ti nymi .
SFX AB ti na .
SFX AB ti nu .
SFX AB ti noj .
SFX AB ti noju .
SFX AB ti no .
SFX AB ti nje/xPxE .
SFX AB ti nja/xPxE .
SFX AB ti nju/xPxE .
SFX AB ti njem/xPxE .
SFX AB ti nij/xPxE .
SFX AB ti njam/xPxE .
SFX AB ti njami/xPxE .
SFX AB ti njah/xPxE .

SFX AC Y 11
SFX AC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AC a o/xPxBxO .
SFX AC a y/xPxE .
SFX AC a u/xPxE .
SFX AC a 0 .
SFX AC a ě/xPxE .
SFX AC 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AC 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AC a oju/xPxE .
SFX AC 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AC a o/xPxE .

SFX AD Y 4
SFX AD to ogo .
SFX AD to om .
SFX AD to omu .
SFX AD to ym .

SFX AE Y 28
SFX AE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AE y o/xBxPxE .
SFX AE y a/xPxE .
SFX AE y ogo/xPxE .
SFX AE y u/xPxE .
SFX AE y oj/xPxE .
SFX AE y om/xPxE .
SFX AE y omu/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AE y oju/xPxE .
SFX AE y i/xPxE .
SFX AE y e/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AE ky ši/zz .
SFX AE ky šego/zz .
SFX AE ky šemu/zz .
SFX AE ky šim/zz .
SFX AE ky šem/zz .
SFX AE ky še/zz .
SFX AE ky ša/zz .
SFX AE ky šu/zz .
SFX AE ky šej/zz .
SFX AE ky šeju/zz .
SFX AE ky ših/zz .
SFX AE ky šim/zz .
SFX AE ky šimi/zz .
SFX AE ky je/zz .

SFX AF Y 28
SFX AF 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AF y o/xBxPxE .
SFX AF y a/xPxE .
SFX AF y ogo/xPxE .
SFX AF y u/xPxE .
SFX AF y oj/xPxE .
SFX AF y om/xPxE .
SFX AF y omu/xPxE .
SFX AF 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AF y oju/xPxE .
SFX AF y i/xPxE .
SFX AF y e/xPxE .
SFX AF 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AF 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AF liky čši/zz .
SFX AF liky čšego/zz .
SFX AF liky čšemu/zz .
SFX AF liky čšim/zz .
SFX AF liky čšem/zz .
SFX AF liky čše/zz .
SFX AF liky čša/zz .
SFX AF liky čšu/zz .
SFX AF liky čšej/zz .
SFX AF liky čšeju/zz .
SFX AF liky čših/zz .
SFX AF liky čšim/zz .
SFX AF liky čšimi/zz .
SFX AF liky če/xPxE .

SFX AG Y 99
SFX AG ti l .
SFX AG ti la .
SFX AG ti lo .
SFX AG ti li .
SFX AG ti ju .
SFX AG ti m .
SFX AG ti ješ .
SFX AG ti š .
SFX AG ti je .
SFX AG ti 0 .
SFX AG ti jemo .
SFX AG ti mo .
SFX AG ti jete .
SFX AG i e .
SFX AG ti jut .
SFX AG ti h .
SFX AG ti še .
SFX AG ti hmo .
SFX AG ti ste .
SFX AG ti hu .
SFX AG ti j .
SFX AG ti jmo .
SFX AG ti jte .
SFX AG ti juči .
SFX AG ti jučego .
SFX AG ti jučemu .
SFX AG ti jučim .
SFX AG ti jučem .
SFX AG ti jučih .
SFX AG ti jučimi .
SFX AG ti juča .
SFX AG ti juču .
SFX AG ti jučej .
SFX AG ti jučeju .
SFX AG ti juče .
SFX AG ti jemy .
SFX AG ti jemogo .
SFX AG ti jemomu .
SFX AG ti jemym .
SFX AG ti jemom .
SFX AG ti jemo .
SFX AG ti jema .
SFX AG ti jemu .
SFX AG ti jemoj .
SFX AG ti jemoju .
SFX AG ti jemi .
SFX AG ti jeme .
SFX AG ti jemyh .
SFX AG ti jemym .
SFX AG ti jemymi .
SFX AG ti my .
SFX AG ti mogo .
SFX AG ti momu .
SFX AG ti mym .
SFX AG ti mom .
SFX AG ti mo .
SFX AG ti ma .
SFX AG ti mu .
SFX AG ti moj .
SFX AG ti moju .
SFX AG ti mi .
SFX AG ti me .
SFX AG ti myh .
SFX AG ti mym .
SFX AG ti mymi .
SFX AG ti vši .
SFX AG ti všego .
SFX AG ti všemu .
SFX AG ti všim .
SFX AG ti všem .
SFX AG ti vših .
SFX AG ti všimi .
SFX AG ti vša .
SFX AG ti všu .
SFX AG ti všej .
SFX AG ti všeju .
SFX AG ti vše .
SFX AG ti ny .
SFX AG ti nogo .
SFX AG ti nomu .
SFX AG ti nym .
SFX AG ti nom .
SFX AG ti ni .
SFX AG ti ne .
SFX AG ti nyh .
SFX AG ti nymi .
SFX AG ti na .
SFX AG ti nu .
SFX AG ti noj .
SFX AG ti noju .
SFX AG ti no .
SFX AG ti nje/xPxE .
SFX AG ti nja/xPxE .
SFX AG ti nju/xPxE .
SFX AG ti njem/xPxE .
SFX AG ti nij/xPxE .
SFX AG ti njam/xPxE .
SFX AG ti njami/xPxE .
SFX AG ti njah/xPxE .

SFX AH Y 5
SFX AH 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AH o o/xPxBxO .
SFX AH o a/xPxE .
SFX AH o u/xPxE .
SFX AH 0 m/xPxE .
