dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
oko/AA
opisati/AB
nikto/AD
težky/AE
veliky/AF
olovo/AH
ataka/AC
ambasada/AC
pisati/AB
inokto/AD
pokryvati/AG
bariera/AC
muzika/AC
buda/AC
inženjerstvo/AH
duga/AC
literatura/AC
pokušati/AG
luka/AC
želězo/AH
tuberkuloza/AC
osvobadžati/AG
sova/AC
odplata/AC
pobudžati/AG
planeta/AC
člověčstvo/AH
viza/AC
izražati/AG
groza/AC
skala/AC
učestničstvo/AH
kljuvati/AG
procedura/AC
korona/AC
matematika/AC
nagrada/AC
napisati/AB
mahati/AG
uraza/AC
odvračati/AG
protivdějstvo/AH
rabstvo/AH
krasa/AC
pokazyvati/AG
odvrgati/AG
nizina/AC
prosba/AC
rabotati/AG
rešta/AC
kupa/AC
sistema/AC
mězga/AC
odvaga/AC
mělky/AE
oglašati/AG
temperatura/AC
kosovo/AH
cěna/AC
tenky/AE
obezglavjati/AG
malina/AC
hristijanstvo/AH
uvěrjati/AG
figura/AC
centrala/AC
obsvětljati/AG
harakteristika/AC
vsekto/AD
zabranjati/AG
vrana/AC
zvězda/AC
zloupotrěbjati/AG
prinudžati/AG
kniga/AC
mogyla/AC
měra/AC
podzrěvati/AG
guba/AC
podkopyvati/AG
pila/AC
česati/AB
ravnina/AC
srěbro/AH
zahvačati/AG
bezdna/AC
porno/AH
kolbasa/AC
gorky/AE
iztirati/AG
věra/AC
brada/AC
dostavati/AG
vlada/AC
kava/AC
igrati/AG
gruda/AC
mašina/AC
mama/AC
nafta/AC
obožati/AG
metoda/AC
dogovarjati/AG
žena/AC
utračati/AG
premiera/AC
raztegati/AG
zlato/AH
podpisati/AB
sintaksa/AC
pozvaljati/AG
opeka/AC
zadovoljstvo/AH
sumněvati/AG
zabava/AC
spoznati/AG
hvoroba/AC
izčezati/AG
sudba/AC
razdavati/AG
odstati/AG
prědpočitati/AG
pružina/AC
povědati/AG
věšati/AG
krěpky/AE
gazeta/AC
někto/AD
dozrěti/AG
sostavjati/AG
sestrinstvo/AH
plata/AC
pritiskati/AG
hlapstvo/AH
odstrašati/AG
jezykovědstvo/AH
moneta/AC
popravjati/AG
različati/AG
slovjanstvo/AH
krivověrstvo/AH
sonata/AC
natiskati/AG
dětinstvo/AH
sěno/AH
vydra/AC
suprovadžati/AG
surabotničstvo/AH
sovětničstvo/AH
posrědničstvo/AH
uvaga/AC
zatvarjati/AG
nadigryvati/AG
odvivati/AG
probivati/AG
surabotati/AG
protivdějati/AG
načinati/AG
spisati/AB
zapisati/AB
prěpisati/AB
obdarjati/AG
prijati/AG
razlamyvati/AG
snižati/AG
ruda/AC
začrvenjati/AG
razgledati/AG
ekipa/AC
nespokojstvo/AH
maroko/AH
pytati/AG
děvičstvo/AH
prěvažati/AG
nakladati/AG
narodobijstvo/AH
rodobijstvo/AH
duhovenstvo/AH
vpisati/AB
prěměščati/AG
rastlina/AC
prědsědateljstvo/AH
vstavati/AG
dokazyvati/AG
duzina/AC
dvorjanstvo/AH
gradžanstvo/AH
istina/AC
izdumati/AG
izrabotyvati/AG
jedinstvo/AH
klientstvo/AH
ljudstvo/AH
malenjky/AE
mladečstvo/AH
molva/AC
obgovarjati/AG
odsutstvo/AH
oplakyvati/AG
ověrjati/AG
pižama/AC
podkupstvo/AH
poručati/AG
prěobražati/AG
priroda/AC
prisutstvo/AH
radničstvo/AH
raziskati/AG
rabotničstvo/AH
rodstvo/AH
rybolovstvo/AH
smečkati/AG
součestničstvo/AH
spokojstvo/AH
sutrudničstvo/AH
supruga/AC
teplo/AH
ustavati/AG
vinogradstvo/AH
voditeljstvo/AH
vodstvo/AH
vsadžati/AG
zabluda/AC
zaplěnjati/AG
zdravotničstvo/AH
bočva/AC
ljudobijstvo/AH
natipkati/AG
porota/AC
pridumati/AG
teplota/AC
usložnjati/AG
violina/AC
odprašati/AG
snabděvati/AG
ustati/AG
zemjedělstvo/AH
prěrazkazyvati/AG
zaměšivati/AG
azbuka/AC
avtorstvo/AH
bogoslužba/AC
doba/AC
dvuženstvo/AH
dyšati/AG
gybky/AE
jednobožstvo/AH
klima/AC
kusati/AG
ljudojedstvo/AH
mnogobožstvo/AH
nuda/AC
odčinjati/AG
opekunstvo/AH
pobědžati/AG
prěstavati/AG
pripisati/AB
proživati/AG
rana/AC
sbližati/AG
šuba/AC
trajati/AG
tvorčestvo/AH
ustrojstvo/AH
vozduhoplavstvo/AH
izgnanstvo/AH
zadrěmati/AG
žarky/AE
hunta/AC
bezpokojstvo/AH
hipnoza/AC
jednoženstvo/AH
jestestvo/AH
jezykoznavstvo/AH
krivoprisežničstvo/AH
naduvati/AG
poiskyvati/AG
vozbogačati/AG
akula/AC
měščanstvo/AH
odbivati/AG
priloga/AC
vnikati/AG
kartina/AC
morjeplavstvo/AH
popruga/AC
spasati/AG
narěkati/AG
posada/AC
privezyvati/AG
prvorodstvo/AH
rukodělstvo/AH
obrabotati/AG
prědstava/AC
odstranjati/AG
trgati/AG
pritvorstvo/AH
prirodovědstvo/AH
proizvodstvo/AH
pověrjati/AG
meksiko/AH
svarjati/AG
podslušivati/AG
marihuana/AC
šarlatanstvo/AH
prirodoznavstvo/AH
zvězdoznavstvo/AH
ljudožerstvo/AH
obžerstvo/AH
zvězdarstvo/AH
odključati/AG
soda/AC
lěpky/AE
klejky/AE
viola/AC
sraka/AC
kuharstvo/AH
džudo/AH
molekula/AC
pečetarstvo/AH
tiskarstvo/AH
drama/AC
zakašljati/AG
pokrčati/AG
zapadati/AG
agava/AC
akušerstvo/AH
avangarda/AC
baronesa/AC
bordo/AH
brenčati/AG
brno/AH
dětstvo/AH
děvstvo/AH
dolgota/AC
gama/AC
glodati/AG
gonitva/AC
ikava/AC
iztkati/AG
jarky/AE
jela/AC
kalina/AC
kopa/AC
krěhky/AE
krtovina/AC
kvokati/AG
lajno/AH
lěpota/AC
lukavstvo/AH
luščina/AC
materinstvo/AH
mlatba/AC
mlězivo/AH
monako/AH
mrčati/AG
napajati/AG
navaga/AC
něměti/AG
neprijateljstvo/AH
obogatěti/AG
očiščati/AG
odpisati/AB
odtěkati/AG
okrajina/AC
obnjuhati/AG
osvěčati/AG
paraliza/AC
prěljubstvo/AH
razčesati/AB
razděti/AG
razkryvati/AG
pukati/AG
raztrata/AC
raztrěskati/AG
tinktura/AC
tonky/AE
vendeta/AC
vitrina/AC
zaraza/AC
izcěljati/AG
bala/AC
anamneza/AC
lihvarstvo/AH
sarajevo/AH
mučeničstvo/AH
namyljati/AG
kazarna/AC
kongo/AH
piratstvo/AH
kaperstvo/AH
mandolina/AC
izmětati/AG
potomstvo/AH
urna/AC
namaščati/AG
dekadentstvo/AH
prěrastati/AG
blokflejta/AC
izmagateljstvo/AH
posrěbrjati/AG
sauna/AC
zatměvati/AG
samohvalstvo/AH
razladžati/AG
raztoptyvati/AG
odpiljati/AG
pilina/AC
omlěvati/AG
trězvěti/AG
brakonierstvo/AH
mimika/AC
razplyvati/AG
negybky/AE
gosteprijemstvo/AH
superničstvo/AH
holera/AC
grnčarstvo/AH
superdržava/AC
prěoděvati/AG
prazdnina/AC
prědpisati/AB
afera/AC
dieta/AC
prědavstvo/AH
prisegati/AG
kripta/AC
pijanstvo/AH
uniforma/AC
pčelarstvo/AH
stodola/AC
norma/AC
tesati/AB
pozvati/AG
granata/AC
kaseta/AC
izslušivati/AG
aura/AC
oktava/AC
pljuskati/AG
tuga/AC
